Arkansas, session 2025, HB1681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1288. Water and Sewer Treatment Facilities Grant Program Fund.
*CRH087*
04-01-2025 17:06:28 CRH087

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/18/25 S4/1/25 HB1681
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the "Water and Sewer Treatment Facilities Grant Program
Fund".
(b) The fund shall consist of any revenues authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Arkansas Natural Resources
Commission to award grants under the Water and Sewer Treatment Facilities
Grant Program established in § 25-43-203.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 43, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-43-203. Water and Sewer Treatment Facilities Grant Program.
(a)(1) There is created within the Arkansas Natural Resources
Commission the Water and Sewer Treatment Facilities Grant Program to be
administered by the commission.
(2) The commission may hire personnel necessary to carry out the
duties of administering the program.
(b) The commission shall:
(1) Create an application form to be submitted by eligible water
and sewer treatment facilities seeking a matching grant from the program;
(2) Devise an application process that:
(A) Defines the eligibility criteria for a matching grant;
and
(B) Establishes application submission and review
processes;
(3) Define a process by which grants may be awarded;
(4) Execute standard legal grant agreements and other
documentation governing the disbursement and use of grants; and
(5) Provide a matching grant to eligible water and sewer
treatment facilities for infrastructure and improvement projects that are
shovel-ready.
(c) A recipient of a grant awarded under this section shall:
(1) Begin the recipient's project within one (1) year of the
award of the grant funds; and
(2) Not be eligible for another grant until the awarded grant
has been closed out.
04-01-2025 17:06:28 CRH087

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/18/25 S4/1/25 HB1681
(d) Funding under the program shall be awarded as follows:
(1) Eighty percent (80%) shall be awarded for shovel-ready
projects in:
(A) Cities of the first class and cities of the second
class with a population over one thousand two hundred (1,200); or
(B) Rural water and rural wastewater systems serving a
population over one thousand two hundred (1,200); and
(2) Twenty percent (20%) shall be awarded in:
(A) Incorporated towns and cities of the second class with
a population of one thousand two hundred (1,200) or less; or
(B) Rural water and rural wastewater systems serving a
population of one thousand two hundred (1,200) or less.
(e) The commission shall promulgate rules to implement this section.
(f) The program shall expire five (5) years from the effective date of
this act.
(g) The commission shall report annually to the Legislative Council
or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee,
regarding the status of all grants awarded under the program.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is in the best interest of
the citizens of this state to provide water and sewer grant opportunities for
projects to keep Arkansas water systems safe and clean; and that this act is
immediately necessary because there is a dire need to protect public health
and safety in Arkansas by replacing water and sewer lines that are in
disrepair and by providing new access to clean water systems to other
citizens. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

04-01-2025 17:06:28 CRH087

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/18/25 S4/1/25 HB1681
/s/Vaught



































04-01-2025 17:06:28 CRH087